Wyoming, session 2025, HB0239.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-6-140 through 35-6-149 are created
to read:

HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
35-6-140. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Reproductive Freedom Act."

35-6-141. Public policy.

(a) It is the public policy of the state that:

(i) Every person has the right to freedom from
governmental interference with respect to personal
reproductive decisions;

(ii) Every person has the right to choose or
refuse birth control;

(iii) Every person has the right to choose or
refuse to have an abortion, except as specifically limited
by this act;

(iv) The state shall not deny or interfere with
a person's right to choose or refuse to have an abortion,
except as specifically permitted by this act;
HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461

(v) The state shall not discriminate against the
exercise of these rights in the regulation or provision of
benefits, facilities, services or information.

35-6-142. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Abortion" means any medical treatment,
medication or procedure intended to induce the termination
of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live
birth;

(ii) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means
as defined by W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i);

(iii) "Health care provider" means a person who
is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted
by the laws of this state to administer health care in the
ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;

HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
(iv) "Physician" means a person licensed to
practice medicine as a physician under the Medical Practice
Act;

(v) "Physician assistant" means a person
licensed to practice medicine as a physician assistant
under the Medical Practice Act;

(vi) "Pregnancy" means the reproductive process
beginning with the implantation of an embryo;

(vii) "Private medical facility" means any
medical facility that is not owned or operated by the
state;

(viii) "State" means the state of Wyoming and
any authority, board, commission, department, division or
separate operating agency of the executive, legislative or
judicial branch of the state of Wyoming, including its
political subdivisions;

(ix) "Viability" means the point in the
pregnancy when, in the judgment of the physician, physician
HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or other
health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice on the particular facts of the case, there is a
significant likelihood of the fetus's sustained survival
outside the uterus without the application of extraordinary
medical measures;

(x) "This act" means W.S. 35-6-140 through
35-6-149.

35-6-143. Right to have and provide an abortion.

(a) The state shall not deny or interfere with a
person's right to have an abortion:

(i) Prior to viability of the fetus; or

(ii) To protect the pregnant woman's life or
health.

(b) A physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse or other health care provider
HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
acting within the provider's scope of practice may
terminate a pregnancy as permitted by this act.

(c) A health care provider may assist a physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or
other health care provider acting within the health care
provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as
permitted by law.

35-6-144. Unauthorized abortions; penalty.

(a) Any person who provides medical treatment,
provides medication or performs a procedure intended to
induce the termination of a pregnancy not authorized by
this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this
section, the state shall not penalize, prosecute or
otherwise take adverse action against a person for aiding
or assisting a person seeking an abortion in exercising the
person's right to have an abortion under this act.
HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461

(c) Nothing in this act shall be construed to subject
a person upon whom any abortion is performed or attempted
to any criminal penalty under this act.

35-6-145. Defense to prosecution.

The good faith judgment of a physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or other
health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice as to viability of the fetus or as to the risk to
the life or health of a person seeking an abortion shall be
a complete defense in any civil or criminal proceeding for
a violation of this act.

35-6-146. State regulation.

(a) Any regulation promulgated by the state relating
to abortion shall be valid only if the regulation is:

(i) Medically necessary to protect the life or
health of the person seeking an abortion; and

HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
(ii) Consistent with established medical
practice.

35-6-147. Refusing to participate in an abortion.

(a) No person or private medical facility shall be
required by law or contract to participate in the attempt
to perform or performance of an abortion if the person or
private medical facility objects to participating in the
attempt to perform or performance of an abortion.

(b) No person shall be discriminated against in
employment or professional privileges because of the
person's participation or refusal to participate in the
attempt to perform or performance of an abortion.

35-6-148. State provided benefits.

If the state provides, directly or by contract, maternity
care benefits, services or information through any program
administered or funded in whole or in part by the state,
the state shall also provide persons otherwise eligible for
the program with substantially equivalent benefits,
HB0239

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0461
services or information to permit them to voluntarily
terminate their pregnancies.

35-6-149. Construction.

This act shall not be construed to define the state's
interest in the fetus for any purpose other than those
purposes expressly provided in this act.

Section 2. W.S. 21-16-1801 and 35-6-120 through
35-6-139 are repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0239